Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5514
Rules and regulations.

The director may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Surplus Lines Insurance Act.

Laws 1978, LB 836, § 12;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 38;

R.S.Supp.,1990, § 44-147.06;

Laws 1992, LB 1006, § 14.